Alabama, session 2026rs, SB164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 11-43B-9, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§11-43B-9
The mayor shall, from time to time, shall prepare a
detailed statement of all receipts and expenses of the city.
At the end of each fiscal year, the council shall cause the
books and accounts of the city to be audited by a reputable,
disinterested certified public accountant. The same accountant
shall not conduct the audit for more than three consecutive
fiscal years. A true summary of the annual audit report shall
be published once in a newspaper of general circulation in the
city. The audit report shall be submitted by the mayor to the
council at its first meeting after the completion of such the
report."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
SB164 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB164
Senate 25-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 08-Apr-26




By: Senator Jones
Page 2